Illinois, session 104th, HB3949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $2,549,200, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Labor Relations Board to meet its 8operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 92025. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.